Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 18 INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM ELECTIONS
34-1819. False return, certification or affidavit by public official unlawful. — It shall be unlawful for any public official or employee knowingly to make any false return, certification or affidavit concerning any petition mentioned in sections 34-1801

34-1822[, Idaho Code], or the signatures appended thereto.

34-1820. Signing more than once or when not qualified unlawful. — It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly sign his own name more than once to any petition mentioned in sections 34-1801

34-1822[, Idaho Code], or to sign his name to any such petition knowing himself at the time of such signing not to be qualified to sign the same.

34-1821. Felonious acts enumerated. — It shall be a felony for any person to offer, propose or threaten to do any act mentioned in this section of or concerning any petition mentioned in sections 34-1801 — 34-1822[, Idaho Code], for any pecuniary reward or consideration: (a) To offer, propose, threaten or attempt to sell, hinder or delay any petition or any part thereof or of any signatures thereon mentioned in sections 34-1801 — 34-1822[, Idaho Code]; (b) To offer, propose, or threaten to desist, for a valuable consideration, from beginning, promoting or circulating any petition mentioned in sections 34-1801

34-1822[, Idaho Code], or soliciting signatures to any such petition; (c) To offer, propose, attempt or threaten in any manner or form to use any petition or power of promotion or opposition in any manner or form for extortion, blackmail or secret or private intimidation of any person or business interest.

34-1822. Penalty for violations. — Any person, either as principal or agent, violating any of the provisions of sections 34-1801

34-1822[, Idaho Code,] shall be punished upon conviction by imprisonment in the penitentiary or in the county jail not exceeding two (2) years, or by a fine not exceeding $5000.00, or by both, excepting that imprisonment in the penitentiary and punishment by a fine shall be the only penalty for violation of any provision of section 34-1821[, Idaho Code].

34-1823. Severability.

In the event that any part of chapter 18, title 34, Idaho Code, shall for any reason be determined void or unenforceable in any part thereof, the remainder thereof shall remain in full force and effect.

34-1803B. Initiative and referendum petitions — Removal of signatures.